Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Distribution and Sales
§ 63-17-113.
Modification of franchise agreement; good cause required for termination, cancellation or nonrenewal.

No person shall modify a franchise agreement during the term of such agreement or upon its renewal if the modification substantially and adversely affects the motor vehicle dealer’s rights, obligations, investment, or return on investment without giving sixty (60) days’ written notice of the proposed modification to the motor vehicle dealer and without showing good cause to the commission.

Notwithstanding any agreement, the following alone shall not constitute good cause for the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal of a franchise agreement: The fact that the new motor vehicle dealer owns, has an investment in, participates in the management of or holds a franchise agreement for the sale or service of another make or line of new motor vehicles, or that the new motor vehicle dealer has established another make or line of new motor vehicles or service in the same dealership facilities as the manufacturer or distributor prior to the effective date of this law, or is approved in writing by the manufacturer or distributor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 418, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 63-17-115.
Unreasonable discrimination prohibited.

A manufacturer or distributor of motor vehicles that directly or indirectly owns or operates a new motor vehicle dealership, in whole or in part, shall not unreasonably discriminate against any other motor vehicle dealer in the same line or make in any matter governed by the franchise agreement, including, but not limited to, the allocation or availability of:

Motor vehicles;

Other manufacturer or distributor products;

Promotional or advertising allowances;

The opportunity to perform warranty work; or

The implementation of dealer programs or benefits.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 418, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 63-17-116.
Relevant market areas established for new motor vehicle dealers in counties having certain populations; notice to same line-make motor vehicle dealer in relevant market area required; standing to object to additional franchise agreements; factors for determining good cause for additional new motor vehicle dealer.

For purposes of this section, “relevant market area” means:

For a proposed new motor vehicle dealer or a new motor vehicle dealer who plans to relocate his or her place of business in a county having a population which is greater than sixty thousand (60,000), the area within a radius of ten (10) miles of the intended site of the proposed or relocated dealer. The ten-mile distance shall be determined by measuring the distance between the nearest surveyed boundary of the existing new motor vehicle dealer’s principal place of business and the nearest surveyed boundary line of the proposed or relocated new motor vehicle dealer’s principal place of business; or

For a proposed new motor vehicle dealer or a new motor vehicle dealer who plans to relocate his or her place of business in a county having a population which is sixty thousand (60,000) or less, the area within radius of fifteen (15) miles of the intended site of the proposed or relocated dealer, or the county line, whichever is closer to the intended site. The fifteen-mile distance shall be determined by measuring the distance between the nearest surveyed boundary line of the existing new motor vehicle dealer’s principal place of business and the nearest surveyed boundary line of the proposed or relocated new motor vehicle dealer’s principal place of business.

As used in this section, “relocate” and “relocation” shall not include the relocation of a new motor vehicle dealer within two (2) miles of its established place of business.

Before a franchisor enters into a franchise establishing or relocating a new motor vehicle dealer within a relevant market area where the same line-make is represented, the franchisor shall give written notice to each new motor vehicle dealer of the same line-make in the relevant market area of its intent to establish an additional dealer or to relocate an existing dealer within that relevant market area.

Within sixty (60) days after receiving the notice provided for in subsection (3) of this section, or within sixty (60) days after the end of any appeal or alternative dispute resolution procedure provided by the franchisor, a new motor vehicle dealer may file a verified complaint before the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission pursuant to Section 63-17-91 to determine whether good cause exists for the establishing or relocating of a proposed new motor vehicle dealer. The Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission shall render a decision on the verified complaint within sixty (60) days of its filing. If the commission fails to render its decision within the sixty-day time period, either party may file an appeal pursuant to Section 63-17-99, and the court will conduct a hearing and take evidence, both oral and documentary, in the place of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission and shall render a decision utilizing the factors set forth in subsection (7).

This section shall not apply to:

The reopening or replacement in a relevant market area of a closed dealership that has been closed within the preceding two (2) years, if the established place of business of the reopened or replacement dealer is within two (2) miles of the established place of business of the closed dealership.

The entering into of a renewal, replacement, or succeeding franchise agreement with an existing motor vehicle dealer whose operations will continue at the dealer’s then current location; or

The relocation of an existing or replacement dealer to a location within the existing or replacement dealer’s own relevant market area if the proposed new location is not within a six-mile radius of any other same line-make motor vehicle dealer.

Only a dealer into whose relevant market area the proposed new franchise or relocated dealer will be located shall have standing to object to the additional franchise agreement or relocation or to take any other action under this chapter with respect to the proposed appointment or relocation. Such a dealer may not protest the relocation of an existing dealer or the establishment of a replacement dealer if the proposed location is further away from the dealer than the relocating or replacement dealer’s current or former location.

In determining whether good cause exists for establishing or relocating an additional new motor vehicle dealer for the same line-make, the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission shall take into consideration the existing circumstances including, but not limited to, the following:

Permanency of the investment;

Effect on the retail motor vehicle business and the consuming public in the relevant market area;

Whether it is injurious or beneficial to the public welfare;

Whether the new motor vehicle dealers of the same line-make in that relevant market area are providing adequate competition and convenient consumer care for the motor vehicles of that line-make in the market area, including the adequacy of motor vehicle sales and qualified service personnel;

Whether the establishment or relocation of the new motor vehicle dealer in the relevant market area would promote competition;

Growth or decline of the population and the number of new motor vehicle registrations in the relevant market area;

Effect on the relocating dealer and the franchisor of a denial of the establishment of a new dealer in, or a relocation of a dealer into, the relevant market area; and

Effect on the objecting dealer of the relocation or establishment of a new proposed franchise location.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 432, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 63-17-117.
Warranty or sales incentive audits to be conducted within certain amount of time after payment of disputed claim or end of incentive or rebate program; approved and paid claims not to be charged back to dealer absent fraud, improper repair, or failure to substantiate claim.

Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise agreement, warranty and sales incentive audits of a motor vehicle dealer’s records may be conducted by the manufacturer or distributor. Any audit for warranty parts or service compensation shall be performed within the twelve-month period immediately following the date of the payment of the disputed claim by the manufacturer or distributor. Any audit for sales incentives, service incentives, rebates or other forms of incentive compensation shall be performed within the twelve-month period immediately following the date of the payment of the disputed claim by the manufacturer or distributor or the end of the program during which the incentives, service incentives, rebates or other forms of incentives compensation were offered, whichever is later.

No claim which has been approved and paid may be charged back to the motor vehicle dealer unless it can be shown by a preponderance of the evidence that the claim was false or fraudulent, that the repairs were not properly made or were unnecessary to correct the defective conditions under generally accepted standards of workmanship, or that the motor vehicle dealer failed to reasonably substantiate the repair in accordance with the manufacturer’s or distributor’s reasonable written claim requirement.

A manufacturer or distributor shall not deny a claim based solely on a motor vehicle dealer’s incidental failure to comply with a specific claim processing requirement such as a clerical error or other administrative technicality that does not call into question the legitimacy of a claim. A motor vehicle dealer may submit an amended or supplemental claim within the time and manner required by the manufacturer for sales incentives, service incentives, rebates or other forms of incentives compensation for up to sixty (60) days from the date on which such a claim was submitted or could have been submitted.

Limitations on warranty parts, service compensation, sales incentive audits, rebates or other forms of incentive compensation, chargebacks for warranty parts or service compensation, and service incentives and chargebacks for sales compensation only, shall not be effective in the case of intentionally false or fraudulent claims.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 418, § 6; Laws, 2014, ch. 349, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 63-17-118.
Manufacturer or distributor to compensate motor vehicle dealer upon termination, cancellation or nonrenewal of franchise or discontinuation of motor vehicle line or make or parts essential to line or make.

Upon any termination, cancellation, refusal to continue, or refusal to renew any franchise or any discontinuation of any line or make of motor vehicle or parts essential to such line or make, the manufacturer or distributor shall pay reasonable compensation to the motor vehicle dealer as follows:

(i) The motor vehicle dealer’s net cost for any new, unused, undamaged, unregistered, unmodified and unsold vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds or less of the current and prior model year with less than seven hundred fifty (750) miles on the odometer that is in the motor vehicle dealer’s inventory and was purchased from the manufacturer or another motor vehicle dealer of the same line or make in the ordinary course of business.

The motor vehicle dealer’s net cost for any new, unused, undamaged, unregistered, unmodified and unsold vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rate of more than sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds of the current and prior model year that is in the motor vehicle dealer’s inventory and was purchased from the manufacturer or another motor vehicle dealer of the same line or make in the ordinary course of business.

The manufacturer or distributor shall have no obligation to repurchase a motor vehicle if the motor vehicle has been modified to the extent that the modifications are so significant as to void the manufacturer’s warranty or has been substantially altered to the prejudice of the manufacturer or distributor. The manufacturer or distributor shall have no obligation to repurchase any parts used to modify the motor vehicle that were not produced by or for the manufacturer or distributor.

The motor vehicle dealer’s net cost of each new, unused and undamaged part or accessory listed in the manufacturer or distributor’s current parts catalog and in the original, resalable merchandising packages. In the case of sheet metal, a comparable substitute for the original package shall be sufficient. New or reconditioned core parts shall be valued at their core value, listed in the original vehicle manufacturer’s or distributor’s current parts catalog. If the part or accessory was purchased by the motor vehicle dealer from another authorized same line or make motor vehicle dealer in the ordinary course of business, the manufacturer shall purchase the part or accessory for the price in the current parts catalog. The motor vehicle dealer shall maintain accurate records regarding the actual purchase price of parts that the manufacturer or distributor is required to purchase under this paragraph.

In addition to the costs referenced in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, the manufacturer shall pay the motor vehicle dealer an additional five percent (5%) charge based on the total compensation due under this section for handling, packing, storing and loading of any parts subject to repurchase pursuant to this section and the manufacturer shall pay for shipping the vehicles subject to repurchase from the location of the motor vehicle dealer to the location directed by the manufacturer.

The manufacturer shall pay the motor vehicle dealer the amounts specified in this subsection within ninety (90) days after the tender of the property, subject to the motor vehicle dealer providing evidence of good and clear title upon return of property to the manufacturer. The manufacturer shall remove the property from the motor vehicle dealer’s premises within one hundred eighty (180) days after the tender of the property.

In the event a manufacturer or distributor cancels, refuses to continue, or refuses to renew any franchise or discontinues any line or make or parts essential to such line or make, in addition to the compensation provided in subsection (1) of this section, the manufacturer or distributor shall pay reasonable compensation to the motor vehicle dealer as follows:

In the event a motor vehicle dealer leases the dealership facilities, then the manufacturer shall be liable for twelve (12) months payment of the gross rent or the remainder of the term of the lease, whichever is less. If the dealership facilities are not leased, then the manufacturer shall be liable for the equivalent of twelve (12) months payment of gross rent based upon the fair market value of the dealership facilities. The gross rent shall be paid only to the extent that the dealership premises are recognized in the franchise and only if they are used solely for performance in accordance with the franchise and not substantially in excess of those facilities recommended by the manufacturer or distributor. If the facility is used for the operations of more than one (1) franchise, the gross rent compensation shall only include the prorated value of the square footage used exclusively for the terminated franchise or line or make at the time of termination. This paragraph shall not apply to a termination, cancellation or nonrenewal due to a sale of the assets or stock of the motor vehicle dealership. In addition to the gross rent, the manufacturer is required to pay the dealer the net cost of any upgrades or other alterations made by the motor vehicle dealer to the dealership facilities which were required in writing by the manufacturer and made by the motor vehicle dealer within two (2) years prior to the effective date of termination. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to relieve a motor vehicle dealer of its obligation to mitigate damages upon termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal. As used in this paragraph “Gross rent” is the monthly rent plus the monthly cost of insurance and taxes.

The manufacturer shall pay the motor vehicle dealer for the value of twelve (12) months of any outstanding amounts on any leases or the remaining amount of the lease, whichever is less, of computer hardware or software that is exclusively used to manage and report data of the terminated line or make to the manufacturer or distributor for financial reporting requirements.

The manufacturer shall pay the motor vehicle dealer for the value of twelve (12) months or the remaining amount of the lease, whichever is less of any outstanding amounts on any manufacturer or distributor required equipment leases, service contracts, and sign leases.

The fair market value of each undamaged sign owned by the motor vehicle dealer which bears a trademark or trade name used or claimed by the manufacturer if the sign was purchased from, or purchased at a requirement of, the manufacturer, plus the costs of installing the sign and the costs of purchasing and installing any pole upon which the sign is located. During the first three (3) years after its purchase, the fair market value of each sign shall be the motor vehicle dealer’s net costs of purchasing the sign. Thereafter, the fair market value of the sign shall be the greater of its actual market value or its depreciated value on the books of the motor vehicle dealer.

The fair market value of all tools, data processing programs and equipment and automotive service equipment owned by the motor vehicle dealer which are exclusively used for the line or make being terminated and which were required in writing and designated as equipment, tools, data processing programs and equipment, and automotive service equipment and purchased from, or purchased as a requirement of, the manufacturer if the equipment, tools, programs and equipment are in usable and good condition, except for reasonable wear and tear. During the first three (3) years after their purchase, the fair market value of each item of equipment, tools, programs, and equipment shall be the motor vehicle dealer’s net cost associated with purchasing the items. Thereafter, the fair market value of each item shall be the greater of its actual market value or its depreciated value on the books of the motor vehicle dealer.

In addition to the other payments set forth in this section, if a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is premised upon the manufacturer discontinuing the sale in this state of a line or make that was the subject of the franchise, then the manufacturer shall also be liable to the motor vehicle dealer for an amount at least equivalent to the fair market value of the motor vehicle dealer’s franchise for the discontinued line or make as of:

The date immediately preceding the date the manufacturer announces the action which results in termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal; or

The day twelve (12) months prior to the date on which the notice of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is issued, whichever amount is higher.

At the motor vehicle dealer’s option, the manufacturer may avoid paying fair market value of the motor vehicle franchise to the motor vehicle dealer under this paragraph if the manufacturer, or another motor vehicle manufacturer pursuant to an agreement with the manufacturer, offers the motor vehicle dealer a replacement motor vehicle franchise with terms substantially similar to that offered to other same line or make motor vehicle dealers.

The manufacturer shall pay the motor vehicle dealer the amounts specified in this subsection along with any other amounts that may be due to the motor vehicle dealer under the franchise agreement within ninety (90) days after the tender of the property, subject to the motor vehicle dealer providing evidence of good and clear title upon return of the property to the manufacturer. The manufacturer shall remove the property within one hundred eighty (180) days after the tender of the property from the motor vehicle dealer’s premises. Unless previous arrangements have been made and agreed upon, the motor vehicle dealer is under no obligation to provide insurance for the property left after one hundred eighty (180) days.

This section shall not apply to any sale, exchange, inheritance, gift or other transfer of ownership, stock, assets, management, or any other rights of the motor vehicle dealer, or to any termination for good cause, including, but not limited to, a conviction for a felony involving moral turpitude, for failure to conduct business for seven (7) consecutive business days or eight (8) business days out of any fifteen-day business period, for insolvency of the motor vehicle dealer or for loss of license to sell motor vehicles, or where there is a failure by the new motor vehicle dealer to comply with a provision of the franchise which provision is both reasonable and of a material significance to the franchise relationship provided that the dealer has been notified in writing of the failure.

This section shall not apply to motor homes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 349, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 63-17-119.
Suit to recover damages; venue; requirement that dealer waive right to trial void.

Notwithstanding any provision of a franchise agreement to the contrary, if any motor vehicle dealer or dealer-operator incurs pecuniary loss due to a violation of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law by a manufacturer or distributor, the motor vehicle dealer or dealer-operator may bring suit in a court of competent jurisdiction and recover damages, together with costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees.

Venue for any proceeding arising from the franchise agreement shall be in Mississippi and shall be consistent with Mississippi law. It is the public policy of this state that venue provided for in this section may not be modified by contract. Any provision contained in the franchise agreement that requires arbitration or litigation to be conducted outside the State of Mississippi shall be void and unenforceable.

Notwithstanding any provision in a franchise agreement to the contrary, any requirement that a dealer waive its right to a trial by jury is void and unenforceable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 418, § 7; Laws, 2006, ch. 432, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2006.